Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2616
Family child care home; location.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including section 71-1914, family child care homes licensed by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 71-1911 or by a city, village, or county pursuant to subsection (2) of section 71-1914 may be established and operated in any residential zone within the exercised zoning jurisdiction of any city or village.

Laws 1991, LB 836, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 16;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 227;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 97;

Laws 1999, LB 594, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 150.